Wyoming statutes. Title 1 Code of Civil Procedure
Article 2. Conduct of Trial; Verdict
§ 1-11-209.
Further information after jury's retirement.

After the jurors have
retired for deliberation, if there is a disagreement between them
as to any part of the testimony, or if they desire to be informed
as to any part of the law arising in the case, they may request the
officer to conduct them to the court where information upon the matter
of law shall be given. The court may give its recollection as to the
testimony on the points in dispute, in the presence of or after notice
to the parties or their counsel.

History.

Laws 1886, ch. 60, § 217; R.S. 1887, § 2557; R.S. 1899, § 3648; C.S. 1910, § 4503; C.S. 1920, § 5773; R.S. 1931, § 89-1310; C.S. 1945, § 3-2412; W.S. 1957, § 1-128; Laws 1977, ch. 188, § 1.

Non-testimonial exhibits may be permitted.—

District court did not abuse its discretion by allowing the jury to review during deliberations a clip of a video that was an exhibit with the sound muted of defendant and a police officer walking through the bedroom where the alleged sexual abuse of a minor occurred because the jury requested to view again the lighting and layout of the bedroom, defendant did not object when the video was admitted into evidence and did not request a limiting instruction, and the district court did not impermissibly alter the video by removing the sound. Hicks v. State, 2021 WY 2, 478 P.3d 652,

2021 Wyo. LEXIS 1

(Wyo. 2021).

Where exact language in jury note sent to trial judge stated “We cannot reach a verdict

…,” those words indicated and expressed disagreement. The court had instructed the jury that its verdict must be unanimous. Apparently, there was not unanimity or there would have been a verdict of guilty or not guilty returned. A deadlock situation was registered. Hoskins v. State, 552 P.2d 342,

1976 Wyo. LEXIS 204

(Wyo. 1976), reh'g denied, 553 P.2d 1390,

1976 Wyo. LEXIS 213

(Wyo. 1976), cert. denied, 430 U.S. 956, 97 S. Ct. 1602, 51 L. Ed. 2d 806, 1977 U.S. LEXIS 1392 (U.S. 1977).

Communications of administrative directives to jury. —

The status of communications between the judge and the jury that do not involve instructions on the law can be characterized as administrative directives, and the harmless error doctrine applies to such communications. Carlson v. Carlson, 888 P.2d 210,

1995 Wyo. LEXIS 1

(Wyo. 1995).

Clarifying communications with jury held proper. —

Where jurors sent the trial court a note asking, “If we cannot find solid proof of trespass, can we award damages?” and it answered “No” without the parties' counsel being present, plaintiffs were not entitled to new trial because (1) answering the question with a definitive “No” left no room for further confusion or undue emphasis on any particular instructions, (2) the jurors had been properly instructed on the burden of proof, and (3) the question did not indicate that the jury was confused about what “preponderance of the evidence” meant. Beck v. Townsend, 2005 WY 84, 116 P.3d 465,

2005 Wyo. LEXIS 98

(Wyo. 2005).

Supplemental Instruction Appropriate. —

In a case
where defendant was charged with attempted second degree sexual abuse
of a minor in Count III of the information, after being questioned
by the jury regarding what act defendant was accused of attempting
to commit in Count III, the district court did not err in providing
a supplemental jury instruction consistent with the information that
the act alleged in Count III was the attempted touching of the victim's
vaginal area. Brown v. State, 2015 WY 4, 340 P.3d 1020,

2015 Wyo. LEXIS 2

(Wyo. 2015).

Provision for giving jury information as to testimony permissive.
—

The part of this section relating to the court giving the jury information as to the testimony in a case is permissive and not mandatory. State v. Riggle, 76 Wyo. 1, 298 P.2d 349,

1956 Wyo. LEXIS 29

(Wyo. 1956).

A judge can refresh the memory of the jurors under this section, but this section is not mandatory. Hoskins v. State, 552 P.2d 342,

1976 Wyo. LEXIS 204

(Wyo. 1976), reh'g denied, 553 P.2d 1390,

1976 Wyo. LEXIS 213

(Wyo. 1976), cert. denied, 430 U.S. 956, 97 S. Ct. 1602, 51 L. Ed. 2d 806, 1977 U.S. LEXIS 1392 (U.S. 1977).

And refusal not ground for reversal, save for injustice. —

The court may decline to refresh the collective memory of the jury, and its not doing so is not ground for reversal except in a case where it is clear that an injustice had been done. Hoskins v. State, 552 P.2d 342,

1976 Wyo. LEXIS 204

(Wyo. 1976), reh'g denied, 553 P.2d 1390,

1976 Wyo. LEXIS 213

(Wyo. 1976), cert. denied, 430 U.S. 956, 97 S. Ct. 1602, 51 L. Ed. 2d 806, 1977 U.S. LEXIS 1392 (U.S. 1977).

In case of disputes on the part of the jury as to the evidence, it is not error for the judge to allow the recollection of the jury to be refreshed, but he may decline to do so altogether, and his doing so would not be ground for reversing the judgment, except in a case where it was clear that injustice had been done. If he should decline to aid the jury in any way, but leave them to recall the evidence as best they could, this would not be ground for reversing the judgment. State v. Riggle, 76 Wyo. 1, 298 P.2d 349,

1956 Wyo. LEXIS 29

(Wyo. 1956).

Denial by court of request for rereading testimony is subject to review

under an abuse of discretion standard. Short v. Spring Creek Ranch, 731 P.2d 1195,

1987 Wyo. LEXIS 391

(Wyo. 1987).

Judicial observation of evidence allowed. —

If the trial judge may refresh the jury's memory, he certainly may make the less nocuous observation that there is evidence. Hoskins v. State, 552 P.2d 342,

1976 Wyo. LEXIS 204

(Wyo. 1976), reh'g denied, 553 P.2d 1390,

1976 Wyo. LEXIS 213

(Wyo. 1976), cert. denied, 430 U.S. 956, 97 S. Ct. 1602, 51 L. Ed. 2d 806, 1977 U.S. LEXIS 1392 (U.S. 1977).

Information as to power and authority of parole board denied.
—

A request by the jury in a murder case to be advised by the court concerning the law as to the power and authority of the board of pardons and parole (now board of parole) was properly denied by the trial court. State v. Riggle, 76 Wyo. 1, 298 P.2d 349,

1956 Wyo. LEXIS 29

(Wyo. 1956).

Nontestimonial exhibits may be permitted. —

Any decision to permit nontestimonial exhibits to be taken into the jury room is within the sound discretion of the trial court. Stephens v. State, 774 P.2d 60,

1989 Wyo. LEXIS 108

(Wyo. 1989), overruled in part, Large v. State, 2008 WY 22, 177 P.3d 807,

2008 Wyo. LEXIS 23

(Wyo. 2008).

Whether audiotape was testimonial exhibit was threshold determination

to be made by the trial court. Stephens v. State, 774 P.2d 60,

1989 Wyo. LEXIS 108

(Wyo. 1989), overruled in part, Large v. State, 2008 WY 22, 177 P.3d 807,

2008 Wyo. LEXIS 23

(Wyo. 2008).

Defendant not prejudiced by absence of counsel. —

Where the state waived any objections to the failure of counsel to object to a supplemental instruction, either before or immediately after it was given, and the trial judge was given an opportunity to rule on the propriety of his instruction, brought to his attention before appeal to the supreme court, so the question was properly raised on appeal, defendant was not prejudiced by the absence of counsel, even if true that defendant was unrepresented at the time the instruction was given to the jury. Hoskins v. State, 552 P.2d 342,

1976 Wyo. LEXIS 204

(Wyo. 1976), reh'g denied, 553 P.2d 1390,

1976 Wyo. LEXIS 213

(Wyo. 1976), cert. denied, 430 U.S. 956, 97 S. Ct. 1602, 51 L. Ed. 2d 806, 1977 U.S. LEXIS 1392 (U.S. 1977).

Presence during instruction of jurors. —

Trial judge erred in instructing the jurors in writing without bringing them into open court and defendant was not present; however, the record did not disclose that defendant's presence when the jury was given the supplemental instructions was critical where defendant could exert his psychological influence during all other phases of the trial and the bulk of the evidence was presented by the victim's testimony.
Daves v. State, 2011 WY 47, 249 P.3d 250,

2011 Wyo. LEXIS 50

(Wyo. 2011).

Jury's unsupervised viewing of witness' videotape improper.
—

The court improperly abdicated its limited statutory discretion when it allowed the jury to view an entire testimonial videotape twice during deliberations, where the court did not ask the jurors why they wanted to view the tape, and it did not know which facts the jurors could not agree upon. Chambers v. State, 726 P.2d 1269,

1986 Wyo. LEXIS 630

(Wyo. 1986).

And conviction reversed due to possible prejudice. —

The conviction of defendant on second degree sexual assault charges supported only by victim's testimony was reversed due to the possible prejudicial impact of allowing the jury to review a videotape of the three-year-old victim's discussion of the alleged crime with police officers, where such review was unsupervised and occurred during jury deliberations without questioning as to why the jurors wished to review the tape. Taylor v. State, 727 P.2d 274,

1986 Wyo. LEXIS 631

(Wyo. 1986).

Abuse of discretion not found. —

The trial court did not abuse its discretion in refusing to allow a total review of the court transcripts where the jurors did not indicate they were in disagreement but merely wanted to review all of the testimony. Marquez v. State, 941 P.2d 22,

1997 Wyo. LEXIS 91

(Wyo. 1997).

Failure to answer question reversible error. —

Reversible error was committed in a second-degree sexual assault case where a trial judge failed to answer a jury's question regarding several incidents; there was confusion due to an improperly drafted information, elements instruction, and verdict form.
Heywood v. State, 2007 WY 149, 170 P.3d 1227,

2007 Wyo. LEXIS 168

(Wyo. 2007).

Applied

in

Britton v. State, 643 P.2d 935,

1982 Wyo. LEXIS 332

(Wyo. 1982).

Cited

in

Jackson v. State, 624 P.2d 751,

1981 Wyo. LEXIS 277

(Wyo. 1981); Natural Gas Processing Co. v. Hull, 886 P.2d 1181,

1994 Wyo. LEXIS 165

(Wyo. 1994).

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

Verdict-urging instructions stressing desirability and importance of agreement, 38 ALR3d 1281.

Verdict-urging instructions commenting on weight of majority view or authorizing compromise, 41 ALR3d 845.

Verdict-urging instruction admonishing jurors to refrain from intransigence or reflecting on integrity or intelligence of jurors, 41 ALR3d 1154.

Prejudicial effect of jury's procurement or use of book during deliberations in criminal cases, 35 ALR4th 626.

§ 1-11-210.
Discharge of jury without verdict.

The jury may be discharged
by the court on account of the sickness of a juror or any accident
or calamity requiring its discharge, or by consent of both parties
or after the jurors have been kept together until it appears there
is no probability of their agreeing.

History.

Laws 1886, ch. 60, § 218; R.S. 1887, § 2558; R.S. 1899, § 3649; C.S. 1910, § 4504; C.S. 1920, § 5774; R.S. 1931, § 89-1311; C.S. 1945, § 3-2413; W.S. 1957, § 1-129; Laws 1977, ch. 188, § 1.

Cross references. —

As to discharge of jury before verdict in criminal case, see §

7-11-205

.

Where exact language in jury note sent to trial judge stated “We cannot reach a verdict

…,” those words indicated and expressed disagreement. The court had instructed the jury that its verdict must be unanimous. Apparently, there was not unanimity or there would have been a verdict of guilty or not guilty returned. A deadlock situation was registered. Hoskins v. State, 552 P.2d 342,

1976 Wyo. LEXIS 204

(Wyo. 1976), reh'g denied, 553 P.2d 1390,

1976 Wyo. LEXIS 213

(Wyo. 1976), cert. denied, 430 U.S. 956, 97 S. Ct. 1602, 51 L. Ed. 2d 806, 1977 U.S. LEXIS 1392 (U.S. 1977).

Judgment of dismissal erroneous. —

After discharge of the jury, the court loses control of the proceedings, except to hold another trial, and judgment of dismissal was erroneous. Jones v. Chicago, B. & Q. R.R., 23 Wyo. 148, 147 P. 508,

1915 Wyo. LEXIS 16

(Wyo. 1915).

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

Statute or court rule relating to alternate or additional jurors or substitution of jurors during trial, 84 ALR2d 1288.

Proper procedure upon illness or other disability of civil case juror, 99 ALR2d 684.

§ 1-11-211.
Retrial after discharge of jury.

When the jury is discharged
after the cause is submitted or during the trial, the cause may be
tried again immediately or at a future time as the court directs.

History.

Laws 1886, ch. 60, § 219; R.S. 1887, § 2559; R.S. 1899, § 3650; C.S. 1910, § 4505; C.S. 1920, § 5775; R.S. 1931, § 89-1312; C.S. 1945, § 3-2414; W.S. 1957, § 1-130; Laws 1977, ch. 188, § 1.

Section superseded by rule to extent it conflicts. —

This section, insofar as it conflicts with Rule 50(b), W.R.C.P., gives way to the rule. In re Estate of Draper, 374 P.2d 425,

1962 Wyo. LEXIS 103

(Wyo. 1962).

No authority to render judgment. —

Under this section, where jury failed to agree and was discharged, court had no authority, on motion, to render judgment for defendant on the pleadings and evidence. Pike & Richardson v. Sheridan, 22 Wyo. 312, 139 P. 912,

1914 Wyo. LEXIS 14

(Wyo. 1914).

Cited

in

Jones v. Chicago B. & Q.R.R., 23 Wyo. 148, 147 P. 508,

1915 Wyo. LEXIS 16

(1915).

§ 1-11-212.
Rendition of verdict.

When the jurors agree
upon their verdict, it shall be reduced to writing and signed by the
foreman. They shall then be conducted into court, their names called
by the clerk and the verdict rendered by the foreman. The clerk shall
then read the verdict to the jury and inquire whether it is their
verdict.

History.

Laws 1886, ch. 60, § 220; R.S. 1887, § 2560; R.S. 1899, § 3652; C.S. 1910, § 4507; C.S. 1920, § 5776; R.S. 1931, § 89-1313; C.S. 1945, § 3-2415; W.S. 1957, § 1-131; Laws 1977, ch. 188, § 1.

Cross references. —

As to return of verdict in criminal cases, see §

7-11-501

.

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

Receipt of verdict in civil case in absence of trial judge, 20 ALR2d 281.

Haste or shortness of time in which jury reached verdict, 91 ALR2d 1220.

Quotient verdict, 8 ALR3d 335.

§ 1-11-213.
Further deliberation; polling jury.

If a jury disagrees,
or if when the jury is polled a juror answers in the negative, or
if the verdict is defective in substance, the jury shall be sent out
again for further deliberation and either party may require the jury
to be polled by the clerk or court asking each juror if it is his
verdict.

History.

Laws 1886, ch. 60, § 221; R.S. 1887, § 2561; R.S. 1899, § 3653; C.S. 1910, § 4508; C.S. 1920, § 5777; R.S. 1931, § 89-1314; C.S. 1945, § 3-2416; W.S. 1957, § 1-132; Laws 1977, ch. 188, § 1.

Purpose of section. —

Procedure under this section is designed for orderly and expeditious conduct of litigation and is particularly directed at minimizing the necessity for additional trials. De Witty v. Decker, 383 P.2d 734,

1963 Wyo. LEXIS 97

(Wyo. 1963).

Verdict “defective in matter of substance” may be corrected by jury

itself on further deliberation under this section. De Witty v. Decker, 383 P.2d 734,

1963 Wyo. LEXIS 97

(Wyo. 1963); Energy Transp. Sys. v. Mackey, 650 P.2d 1152,

1982 Wyo. LEXIS 380

(Wyo. 1982).

And court may submit additional instructions. —

If necessary, the court may assist the jury in its further deliberation by submitting additional instructions. De Witty v. Decker, 383 P.2d 734,

1963 Wyo. LEXIS 97

(Wyo. 1963); Energy Transp. Sys. v. Mackey, 650 P.2d 1152,

1982 Wyo. LEXIS 380

(Wyo. 1982).

Jury should continue deliberations following verdict for special
damages only. —

Following a jury verdict for special damages only, i.e., medical expenses, and an objection before the jury was discharged, in a motor vehicle accident case, the trial court erred in not returning the jury to continue their deliberations for the purpose of assessing general damages, i.e., pain and suffering. Smith v. Uhrich, 704 P.2d 698,

1985 Wyo. LEXIS 523

(Wyo. 1985).

Effect of failure to object to form of verdict. —

Where no objection was made to the form of verdict given to the jury and no objection seems to have been raised when they returned it, so as to give an opportunity for correction, the objection came too late after the jury was discharged. De Witty v. Decker, 383 P.2d 734,

1963 Wyo. LEXIS 97

(Wyo. 1963); Anderson v. Foothill Indus. Bank, 674 P.2d 232,

1984 Wyo. LEXIS 239

(Wyo. 1984).

When a verdict is not in proper form and the jury is not required to clarify it, any error in the verdict is waived by the party relying thereon who at the time of its rendition failed to make any request that its informality or uncertainty be corrected. De Witty v. Decker, 383 P.2d 734,

1963 Wyo. LEXIS 97

(Wyo. 1963).

Having in mind the plain purpose of this section, to afford a jury the right to correct its own mistakes, it is not harsh or unreasonable to require a litigant, when an opportunity is afforded during the trial, timely, to bring a matter to the attention of the trial court in order that it might be corrected, and failing in this that he shall not be heard to complain, for to hold otherwise would seem unfair to the jury, to the trial court and to the other litigants, to say nothing of the unnecessary loss of time and expense. De Witty v. Decker, 383 P.2d 734,

1963 Wyo. LEXIS 97

(Wyo. 1963).

Despite the demonstrated reluctance of the jury to accept plaintiff's extensive claims at face value, it was incumbent upon her at least to attempt to see that a verdict in proper form was returned by the jury, and not having done so, the supreme court is not at liberty to grant relief. De Witty v. Decker, 383 P.2d 734,

1963 Wyo. LEXIS 97

(Wyo. 1963).

The defendant's failure to seek to correct any substantive defect in the special verdict when it was returned to the trial court was a waiver of his right to do so and he could not be heard to complain on appeal unless the doctrine of plain error would come to his rescue. Goggins v. Harwood, 704 P.2d 1282,

1985 Wyo. LEXIS 526

(Wyo. 1985).

Challenges to irregular or inconsistent verdicts may be waived

by the failure to object before the discharge of a jury. Caterpillar Tractor Co. v. Donahue, 674 P.2d 1276,

1983 Wyo. LEXIS 397

(Wyo. 1983).

Although there was no inherent error in telling the jury what the plaintiff's burden of proof was and that it must decide whether the plaintiff's injuries were caused by the alleged assault and battery, and then instructing the jury to assess damages without regard to its findings concerning the fact of the assault and whether or not it proximately caused any injuries, it was impossible to reconcile the jury's findings that there was an assault and battery and that the assault was not a “proximate cause of the injuries” with the testimony of the treating doctors who testified without conflict that the plaintiff in fact received injuries resulting in the necessity to prescribe and purchase medication. Therefore, the verdict of the jury was inconsistent and improper on its face. However, even though the substantial rights of the plaintiff were affected, because of the opportunity to correct the verdict offered by this section, which the plaintiff did not take advantage of, this error was waived. Goggins v. Harwood, 704 P.2d 1282,

1985 Wyo. LEXIS 526

(Wyo. 1985).

The failure to raise a matter before the jury is released results in waiver of the right to complain about inconsistencies or irregularities in the verdict. Moreover, because of the opportunity to correct the verdict, the complaining party will be held to have waived the error notwithstanding its degree of irregularity or impropriety. Halliburton Co. v. Claypoole, 868 P.2d 252,

1994 Wyo. LEXIS 15

(Wyo. 1994).

Where counsel for defendant is not present when verdict is returned,

but has absented himself through choice because of his individual convenience and necessity, receiving verdict in his absence and failing to resubmit the verdict to jury is not error. Pure Gas & Chem. Co. v. Cook, 526 P.2d 986,

1974 Wyo. LEXIS 234

(Wyo. 1974).

Where exact language in jury note sent to trial judge stated “We cannot reach a verdict

…,” those words indicated and expressed disagreement. The court had instructed the jury that its verdict must be unanimous. Apparently, there was not unanimity or there would have been a verdict of guilty or not guilty returned. A deadlock situation was registered. Hoskins v. State, 552 P.2d 342,

1976 Wyo. LEXIS 204

(Wyo. 1976), reh'g denied, 553 P.2d 1390,

1976 Wyo. LEXIS 213

(Wyo. 1976), cert. denied, 430 U.S. 956, 97 S. Ct. 1602, 51 L. Ed. 2d 806, 1977 U.S. LEXIS 1392 (U.S. 1977).

Cited

in

Big-O Tires, Inc. v. Santini, 838 P.2d 1169,

1992 Wyo. LEXIS 129

(Wyo. 1992).

Applied

in

Thunder Hawk v. Union Pac. R.R., 891 P.2d 773,

1995 Wyo. LEXIS 39

(Wyo. 1995).

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

Polling jury, 71 ALR2d 640.

Propriety and prejudicial effect of trial court's inquiry as to numerical division of jury, 77 ALR3d 769.

Products liability: inconsistency of verdicts on separate theories of negligence, breach of warranty or strict liability, 41 ALR4th 9.

Propriety of reassembling jury to amend, correct, clarify, or otherwise change verdict after discharge or separation at conclusion of civil case, 19 ALR5th 622.

§ 1-11-214.
Discharge of jury; correcting defective verdict.

If no disagreement is
expressed and neither party requires the jury to be polled, or on
polling each juror answers in the affirmative, the verdict is complete
and the jury shall be discharged. If the verdict is defective in form
only, it may be corrected by the court with the assent of the jurors
before they are discharged.

History.

Laws 1886, ch. 60, § 222; R.S. 1887, § 2562; R.S. 1899, § 3654; C.S. 1910, § 4509; C.S. 1920, § 5778; R.S. 1931, § 89-1315; C.S. 1945, § 3-2417; W.S. 1957, § 1-133; Laws 1977, ch. 188, § 1.

Applied

in

Big-O Tires, Inc. v. Santini, 838 P.2d 1169,

1992 Wyo. LEXIS 129

(Wyo. 1992).

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

Validity of verdict awarding medical expenses to personal injury plaintiff, but failing to award damages for pain and suffering, 55 ALR4th 186.